Massachusetts, session 194th, H2823.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Worcester
regional retirement board shall pay to Joanne Songy, surviving spouse of detective John D.
Songy, a police officer in the town of Rutland who died from complications related to COVID-
19, benefits pursuant to section 100 of chapter 32 of the General Laws; provided, however, that
all amounts paid hereunder shall be non-taxable to the extent allowable under state law.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the state board
of retirement shall pay to Joanne Songy, surviving spouse of detective John D. Songy, a police
officer in the town of Rutland who died from complications related to COVID-19, benefits
pursuant to section 100A of chapter 32 of the General Laws; provided, however, that all amounts
paid hereunder shall be non-taxable to the extent allowable under state law.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect as of May 29, 2020.
of 1